New Jersey, session 222, S389.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A person shall not knowingly, with purpose to expose another to harassment or risk of harm to life or property, or in reckless disregard of the probability of such exposure,  post or publish on the Internet the home address or unpublished home telephone number of any judge, prosecutor, or court administrative personnel.  A violation of this act is a crime of the fourth degree. As used in this act: Judge means any justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Superior Court, judge of the Tax Court or municipal judge. Prosecutor means a county prosecutor, first assistant prosecutor or assistant prosecutor as defined in N.J.S.2A:158-1 et seq. Court administrative personnel means the Administrative Director of the Courts and other employees of the Administrative Office of the Courts as may be designated by the Chief Justice. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.